Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,252
Act; applicability.

The Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Contractors Certification and System Registration Act does not apply to a private onsite wastewater treatment system at an electric generation facility site owned by a district organized under Chapter 70, article 6.

Laws 2003, LB 94, § 17.